Utah statutes.
58-40a-401.   Grounds for denial of license.

The division may refuse to issue a license to an applicant, refuse to renew the license of a licensee, revoke, suspend, restrict, or place on probation the license of a licensee, issue a public or private reprimand to a licensee, and issue cease and desist orders in accordance with Section 58-1-401.



Enacted by Chapter 206, 2006 General Session

